South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4597.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-37-220(B) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (54) to the extent not already exempt pursuant to Section 12-37-250, one hundred percent of the fair market value of the primary residence of an individual who has reached the age of seventy years on or before December thirty-first, eighty percent of the fair market value of the primary residence of an individual who has reached the age of sixty-nine years on or before December thirty-first, sixty percent of the fair market value of the primary residence of an individual who has reached the age of sixty-eight years on or before December thirty-first, forty percent of the fair market value of a primary residence of an individual who has reached the age of sixty-seven years on or before December thirty-first, and twenty percent of the fair market value of the primary residence of an individual who has reached the age of sixty-six years on or before December thirty-first. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----